Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin METROPOLITAN COUNCIL COMMUNITY TREE-PLANTING GRANTS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Metropolitan Council for community tree-planting grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.355. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end